Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1293.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; COTTAGE GROVE RAVINE REGIONAL PARK.new text end new text begin $2,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the Metropolitan Council for a grant to Washington County to construct and equip lighting along trails in Cottage Grove Ravine Regional Park. This appropriation is onetime and is available until the project is completed or abandoned, subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.642. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end